Utah statutes.
77-23a-5.   Traffic in intercepting devices -- Offenses -- Lawful
activities.
(1)  Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, any person is
guilty of a third degree felony who intentionally:
(a)  sends through the mail, or sends or carries in intrastate, interstate, or
foreign commerce any electronic, mechanical, or other device, knowing or
having reason to know that the design of the device renders it primarily
useful for the purpose of the surreptitious interception of wire, electronic,
or oral communications;
(b)  manufactures, assembles, possesses, or sells any electronic, mechanical,
or other device, knowing or having reason to know that the design of the
device renders it primarily useful for the purpose of the surreptitious
interception of wire, electronic, or oral communications; or
(c)  places in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication any
advertisement of:
(i)  any electronic, mechanical, or other device knowing or having reason to
know that the design of the device renders it primarily useful for the purpose
of the surreptitious interception of wire, electronic, or oral communications;
or
(ii)  any other electronic, mechanical, or other device, where the
advertisement promotes the use of the device for the purpose of the
surreptitious interception of wire, electronic, or oral communications.
(2)  The following persons may send through the mail, send or carry in
intrastate, interstate, or foreign commerce, or manufacture, assemble,
possess, or sell any electronic, mechanical, or other device knowing or having
reason to know that the design of the device renders it primarily useful for
the purpose of surreptitious interception of wire, electronic, or oral
communication:
(a)  a provider in the normal course of the business of providing that wire or
electronic communications service; or
(b)  an officer, agent, or employee of, or a person under contract with, the
United States, a state, or a political subdivision, in the normal course of
the activities of the United States, a state, or a political subdivision.
